Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1869.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 47.66 RCW to read as follows:(1) No Washington state funds may be expended for the construction of any capital project; the purchase of any transit vehicle; the purchase of any other capital item; or any other capital cost, for a transit agency created pursuant to the laws of an adjacent state.(2) For purposes of this section, "transit vehicle" means every motor vehicle, streetcar, train, trolley vehicle, and any other device, which is used for the purpose of carrying passengers together with incidental baggage and freight on a regular schedule.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2025.--- END ---